Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 18. Department of Correctional Education.

§§ 22.1-339 through 22.1-345.1.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 100.

Editor’s note.

Former Chapter 18 (§§ 22.1-339 and 22.1-345.1), pertaining to the Department of Correctional Education, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 22-41.1 through 22-41.7, Acts 1996, c. 744, 1989, c. 136, 2004, cc. 875 and 912; 1974, c. 394; 1976, c. 723; 1979, c. 700; 1980, c. 559; 1985, cc. 447, 448; 1989, c. 733; 1991, c. 79; 1992, c. 151; 1995, c. 700; 1996, cc. 703, 726, 744, 1000; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2001, c. 483; 2004, cc. 465, 872; 2007, cc. 63, 72, 142, 149.